Utah statutes.
17C-3-106.   Economic development project area plan to be adopted by
community legislative body.
(1)  An economic development project area plan approved by board resolution
under Subsection 17C-3-102(1)(g) may not take effect until it has been adopted
by ordinance of the legislative body of the community that created the agency
and notice under Section 17C-3-107 is provided.
(2)  Each ordinance under Subsection (1) shall:
(a)  be adopted by the community legislative body after the board's approval
of a resolution under Subsection 17C-3-102(1)(g); and
(b)  designate the approved project area plan as the official economic
development plan of the project area.
